New York, session 2025-2026, A3761.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 7 of the cannabis law are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The cannabis control board is hereby created and shall consist of a 4 chairperson nominated by the governor and with the advice and consent of 5 the senate, with one vote, and [four] six other voting board members as 6 provided for in subdivision two of this section. 7 2. Appointments. In addition to the chairperson, the governor shall 8 have [two] four direct appointments to the board, and the temporary 9 president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly shall each have 10 one direct appointment to the board. Appointments shall be for a term of 11 three years each and should, to the extent possible, be geographically 12 and demographically representative of the state and communities histor- 13 ically affected by the war on drugs. Board members shall be citizens and 14 permanent residents of this state. The chairperson and the remaining 15 members of such board shall continue to serve as chairperson and members 16 of the board until the expiration of the respective terms for which they 17 were appointed. Upon the expiration of such respective terms the succes- 18 sors of such chairperson and members shall be appointed to serve for a 19 term of three years each and until their successors have been appointed 20 and qualified. The members, except for the chairperson, shall when 21 performing the work of the board, be compensated at a rate of two 22 hundred sixty dollars per day, and together with an allowance for actual 23 and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties. The 24 chairperson shall receive an annual salary not to exceed an amount 25 appropriated therefor by the legislature, and their expenses actually EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05366-01-5 A. 3761 2 1 and necessarily incurred in the performance of their official duties, 2 unless otherwise provided by the legislature. No member or member's 3 spouse or minor child shall have any interest in an entity regulated by 4 the board. 5 § 2. Subdivisions 2 and 3 of section 14 of the cannabis law are 6 amended to read as follows: 7 2. The state cannabis advisory board shall consist of [thirteen] nine- 8 teen voting appointed members, along with a representative from the 9 department of environmental conservation, the department of agriculture 10 and markets, the office of children and family services, the department 11 of labor, the department of health, the division of housing and communi- 12 ty renewal, the office of addiction services and supports, and the 13 department of education, serving as non-voting ex-officio members. The 14 governor shall have [seven] eleven appointments, the temporary president 15 of the senate and the speaker of the assembly shall each have [three] 16 four appointments to the board. The members shall be appointed to each 17 serve three year terms and in the event of a vacancy, the vacancy shall 18 be filled in the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of 19 the term. The appointed members and representatives shall receive no 20 compensation for their services but shall be allowed their actual and 21 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as board 22 members. 23 3. Advisory board members shall have statewide geographic represen- 24 tation that is balanced and diverse in its composition. Appointed 25 members shall have an expertise in public and behavioral health, 26 substance use disorder treatment, effective rehabilitative treatment for 27 adults and juveniles, homelessness and housing, economic development, 28 environmental conservation, job training and placement, criminal 29 justice, and drug policy. Further, the advisory board shall include 30 residents from communities most impacted by cannabis prohibition, one 31 retail licensee, one processor licensee, one representative of organized 32 labor, one microbusiness licensee, one distributor licensee, one service 33 disabled veteran licensee, one cultivator licensee, one registered 34 organization licensee, people with prior drug convictions, the formerly 35 incarcerated, and representatives from the farming industry, cannabis 36 industry, and organizations serving communities impacted by past federal 37 and state drug policies. 38 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.